Connecticut, session 2026, HB05301.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) To the extent permissible
2 under federal law, the Commissioner of Social Services shall seek a
3 federal Medicaid waiver or amend the Medicaid state plan, as necessary,
4 to disregard from income eligibility determinations any income earned
5 by a person who provides more than twenty-five per cent of daily care
6 for such person's spouse, who has applied for or is receiving services
7 under a Medicaid waiver program providing home and community-
8 based services.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
AGE Joint Favorable
HB5301 / File No. 94 1

HB5301 File No. 94
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Social Services, Dept. GF - Potential See Below See Below
Cost
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a potential cost to the Department of Social Services
(DSS) by requiring the agency to disregard earned income for spousal
caregivers who provide at least 25% of daily care for partners receiving
Medicaid-funded home- and community-based services (HCBS).
Currently, when someone applies for HCBS under a Medicaid
waiver, DSS does not consider the applicant spouse's income when
determining eligibility for the program.
However, to the extent DSS determines that an individual must
contribute to their cost of care once eligible, the state may incur a
potential cost related to an increased Community Spouse Allowance
(CSA) deduction because of not counting the spouse's income in the
calculation.
The cost to the state is dependent upon 1) how many HCBS
individuals must contribute to their cost of care, and 2) how many of
these individuals have spouses who provide at least 25% of their daily
care.
HB5301 / File No. 94 2

HB5301 File No. 94
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation and shifts in Medicaid
enrollment.
HB5301 / File No. 94 3

HB5301 File No. 94
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5301
AN ACT EXCLUDING SPOUSAL INCOME FROM CERTAIN RENT,
FEE AND COST-SHARING CALCULATIONS RELATING TO HOME
AND COMMUNITY-BASED SERVICES.